Louisiana, session 2026, HB1176.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 22:1077.6 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1077.6. Required coverage for integrative cancer treatments; Medicare Advantage
A. A Medicare Advantage plan offered in this state shall provide coverage
for integrative care services when such services are recommended by nationally
recognized clinical practice guidelines and are rendered in conjunction with the
diagnosis, treatment, or management of a covered medical condition. Coverage
pursuant to this Section may be contingent upon annual deductibles, coinsurance,
copayments, and prior authorization requirements consistent with those established
by the Medicare Advantage plan.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1176 ENROLLED
(1) "Integrative care services" means evidence-based therapeutic modalities
employed alongside conventional medical treatments and endorsed by nationally
recognized clinical practice guidelines. These modalities include but are not limited
to acupuncture, cryotherapy, and scalp cooling systems that are specifically designed
for repeated use and that serve a medical purpose.
(2) "Medicare Advantage plan" means any Medicare Part C coordinated care
plan, private fee-for-service plan, or other plan type approved by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services and offered by a Medicare Advantage organization
licensed pursuant to this Title.
C. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to prohibit a Medicare
Advantage plan from establishing utilization management protocols consistent with
federal law and the terms of the plan, if such protocols do not conflict with the
coverage requirements established in this Section.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to mandate coverage by a
Medicare Advantage plan in a manner that conflicts with federal law or regulations
governing Medicare Advantage. The provisions of this Section shall apply only to
the extent permitted under federal law and shall be interpreted consistent with all
applicable federal requirements.
E. A Medicare Advantage organization offering a Medicare Advantage plan
in this state shall, to the extent allowed under federal law, provide coverage for
integrative care services in accordance with nationally recognized clinical practice
guidelines when such services are recommended for the diagnosis, treatment, or
management of a covered medical condition.
F. Pursuant to this Section, the commissioner of insurance shall do all of the
following:
(1) Submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services any
notifications or materials required to implement the provisions of this Section, if
applicable.
(2) Promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act as necessary to implement the provisions of this Section.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1176 ENROLLED
(3) Take any other actions necessary to implement the provisions of this
Section to the extent permitted under federal law.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act apply to any new policy, contract, or health
coverage plan issued on and after January 1, 2027. Any policy, contract, or health coverage
plan in effect prior to January 1, 2027, shall convert to conform to the provisions of this Act
on or before the renewal date, but no later than January 1, 2028.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.